epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/af.xml
	<patterns>
		.aan5s4
		.aä7lawa
		.a6bc-b
		.a4b5la
		.ab7salo
		.a6b-ja
		.ac7cra.
		.a6farm
		.af7arm.
		.a6feet
		.af7eet.
		.a4f5en
		.a6fets
		.af7ets.
		.a6foes
		.af7oes.
		.a4f5oo
		.a4f5ra
		.af6ro’
		.a7fro’s
		.af6ro-
		.a7fro-h
		.a6fry.
		.af3s
		.ag6aam
		.agte6r5
		.a6guur
		.a9ha.
		.ah7lers
		.a3kw
		.a6leer
		.al7eer.
		.alf4
		.al7fagr
		.al5fr
		.al6lda
		.a4l3o
		.al6oïe
		.a7loïen
		.al3p
		.al5st
		.al7thea
		.al7twee
		.al6zhe
		.amp4s
		.amps5w
		.a6naër
		.an7aëro
		.an6cpl
		.and4
		.an5dr
		.ang4
		.an5gl
		.angs5
		.a4n5io
		.an7thro
		.a3pr
		.ap7side
		.a5rag
		.ara6p.
		.ar7thur
		.ar6zbe
		.as7jas.
		.a6snog
		.a6sof.
		.a5sti
		.a7straa
		.a7s6tral
		.at6hol
		.a7thol.
		.a5tsj
		.atte4
		.au7drey
		.b6aanv
		.ba6din
		.ba4d5o
		.ba7loi.
		.ba7ragw
		.ba7rins
		.ba6sek
		.ba7tho.
		.be7deks
		.be6kaf
		.bek7af.
		.be5la
		.be7lol.
		.be7skos
		.be7thel
		.be7thul
		.bi7sho.
		.bli4
		.blus5
		.bo7kerf
		.bo7kies
		.bo7kors
		.bo7maat
		.b4on
		.bo7plaa
		.bo5ro
		.bo7sor.
		.bo5sta
		.bo7trit
		.bo7tswa
		.bo7uit.
		.bout5j
		.b4re
		.bu6eno
		.bu6lol
		.bu7thel
		.by6ldr
		.by6lho
		.by6lne
		.by6lpi
		.by7port
		.bys4
		.by6tal
		.ca7thy.
		.ca7yenn
		.chlo7e.
		.ci6rca
		.ci7trus
		.cos7ta.
		.cy6pri
		.d2
		.da7gon.
		.dag5s
		.da6kat
		.da6koo
		.da7tage
		.da6tji
		.dat7jie
		.da6wki
		.de6k7laa
		.de6klo
		.de6kwe
		.de5la
		.de7roga
		.de6sal
		.de6sok
		.de4sp
		.diep5l
		.di6jks
		.di4si
		.di7thak
		.do4m5a
		.do4m5o
		.dor7ste.
		.dr6oef
		.dun5s
		.du6pre
		.dut5j
		.dy7spie
		.e6bcu.
		.ed5wa
		.ed7win.
		.eer6sk
		.ee4t
		.e6fron
		.ef7ron.
		.eg7gofo
		.e6indu
		.ei5st
		.ek4s5k
		.ek7sopa
		.ek7sord
		.eks7tri
		.eks7tro
		.en7dres
		.enk4
		.en5kl
		.e6noft
		.en7ofta
		.en4t5j
		.en7topt
		.ep7soms
		.er4d5a
		.er6dwo
		.er6fle
		.er6foo
		.er6inv
		.ern4
		.er4t4
		.er5te
		.ert5j
		.ert7se.
		.erts5w
		.e2s
		.e9sau
		.e4s3k
		.e3so
		.es3p
		.es8p.
		.es6pma
		.es3t
		.es6tco
		.es6tni
		.es5tr
		.e7tage.
		.et4sn
		.eur5a
		.eu7stac
		.ex7odus
		.e6zra.
		.f2
		.fo6chv
		.fo6wle
		.f4ri
		.fy6tji
		.g2
		.ga7lage
		.ga7lago
		.ga6lap
		.ga6loo
		.g6arbo
		.ga6sen
		.ge7dart
		.ge3g
		.ge7geks
		.ge7guil
		.gekun5
		.gekuns6
		.ge5la
		.ge7mopp
		.ge7muit
		.ge7nève
		.ge7rogg
		.ges4
		.ge7sjab
		.ge7sjar
		.ge5sk
		.ge5so
		.ges7pe.
		.ge7sper.
		.ge7steg
		.gif3
		.gi7gagr
		.gi6sen
		.gly3
		.gly5k
		.g6lyna
		.g4oo
		.gou7da.
		.gr6äbe
		.g6ruba
		.gui7do.
		.hang5s
		.he6blu
		.he6gor
		.he6gra
		.h6eind
		.hek5o
		.he7rakl
		.he6r5en
		.he6wle
		.hi8v.
		.ho6fet
		.ho6laa
		.ho6loo
		.hooi5
		.ho7taze
		.ho4t5o
		.hy6gro
		.ic7teru
		.i4gl
		.ile7us.
		.i2n1
		.i9n8a.
		.in6ari
		.i7narie
		.ind4
		.in7dwar
		.ing4
		.in5gr
		.in5gw
		.in6iti
		.in5kl
		.in6kly
		.in5kn
		.in5kw
		.in6osi
		.i7nosie
		.in3s4
		.in7snee
		.in7twyf
		.i5raa
		.i3sa
		.i4sk
		.i3so
		.ja6gli
		.jah7we.
		.ja6spa
		.ja7taga
		.j6äger
		.je7sopp
		.jo7dofo
		.jo7safa
		.ju6kos
		.juk7os.
		.j6ü6rge
		.jy6sel
		.k2
		.kaar4
		.kade4
		.kadet5
		.k4af
		.kaï7ro.
		.ka7nont
		.ka6pla
		.ka7plak
		.k6arbe
		.ka7thar
		.ka7thu.
		.ka6toë
		.kat7oë.
		.ka6tui
		.ke6ple
		.ker6k5a
		.ker6k5l
		.kerk5r
		.ker6sa
		.ker6sl
		.ker6s5p
		.ke4s5t
		.kie6st
		.ki6pli
		.ki4r
		.kit7se.
		.k4la
		.k6leyn
		.k4li
		.klip5
		.knik5
		.kn6opn
		.ko6maa
		.ko6maf
		.k4op
		.kope4
		.koper7a
		.ko6pla
		.kop5o
		.ko7rag.
		.kor6st
		.kors7te.
		.k6rak.
		.kr6üge
		.kryt5
		.ku7mon.
		.k4we
		.k4wo
		.ky7otop
		.l’7etji
		.la6eti
		.la6kwa
		.la5sa
		.lei5s4
		.lek7oë.
		.le6poo
		.le5pr
		.le7shab
		.le6son
		.le4sp
		.les5t
		.le6suu
		.lig5e
		.li4gi
		.li6gom
		.li6gre
		.li7pase
		.l6loyd
		.lo6chn
		.lof7ui.
		.lo6glê
		.l6ontd
		.los5k
		.lu6gen
		.lui5sl
		.l6üder
		.m2
		.m’7etji
		.ma6cdo
		.ma6nal
		.ma6nur
		.ma7stek
		.ma7thes
		.ma6zda
		.mel6k5a
		.mel6k5l
		.mer6k5l
		.mes5m
		.me4sw
		.me6tem
		.mi6dos
		.mi6rba
		.mi7traa
		.m4ne
		.mo7djad
		.mo7flam
		.mo6sin
		.mo4sk
		.mu4e
		.my6nen
		.my6n5in
		.my7unis
		.n2
		.n6aand
		.na5fl
		.na6gro
		.na7groe
		.na7smaa
		.na7stor
		.na7uurs
		.ne4k5a
		.ne4k5o
		.ne6kri
		.nek7rin
		.ne6kys
		.ne4s3
		.ne7serh
		.n6etik
		.ne4t5j
		.ne6tru
		.ne6wca
		.ne6wfo
		.ne6wla
		.ne6wma
		.ni4e
		.ni6jho
		.ni6rva
		.nix7on.
		.n6kosa
		.noet4
		.noe5tj
		.no6gee
		.no4k
		.n6ondu
		.nu4l
		.ny7lont
		.oe5kr
		.oe4r
		.oe7ralg
		.oe7rang
		.oer7os.
		.oe4s3
		.o4gl
		.oh7rigs
		.o6klah
		.ok7laho
		.ol6ieu
		.o7lieui
		.oms4
		.o2n1
		.ond6ui
		.on7duit
		.o6nemo
		.on6ias
		.o7nias.
		.on3k
		.on7parm
		.on3s4
		.on6she
		.on6sse
		.on6t7eer
		.on6t5er
		.on4tr
		.ont7ras
		.ont5ri
		.o9nus
		.on6us.
		.oon4
		.oon7de.
		.o4op
		.oor5n
		.oor5s4
		.oo4s
		.o6peet
		.op7eet.
		.o6peg.
		.o6pein
		.o6p5erd
		.o4pof
		.o4pr
		.op5ra
		.ops4
		.op7smuk
		.o7ragie
		.or6kne
		.o3ro
		.orto5
		.o4sk
		.os5ko
		.os7oog.
		.ot6hel
		.o7thell
		.ou6doo
		.ou7nôi.
		.ou5tj
		.p2
		.pa4d3
		.pa7die.
		.pa6vlo
		.pe5la
		.pel6sk
		.per6st
		.pe4sk
		.pe4st
		.pie6tj
		.pi7laf.
		.pit5s
		.p4la
		.po6dzo
		.p6oefe
		.poen4
		.p6ontw
		.po6sad
		.p4re
		.pu6tad
		.py6paa
		.py6pla
		.py6pol
		.pyp5r
		.py7thon
		.r2
		.r’7etji
		.r6aard
		.ra7dart
		.ra6seg
		.ras7eg.
		.re7aumu
		.re6gru
		.rek5s
		.re6mas
		.rem7as.
		.re6mco
		.re4sl
		.rie4t
		.riet5j
		.riet5r
		.ri6ple
		.roc7ky.
		.ro6gak
		.ron7do.
		.rond5s
		.ro5py
		.ros5t
		.ro6tre
		.ro6wli
		.ru7klip
		.ruk4o
		.ru7kope
		.ru7staa
		.ru6suu
		.ry4k5a
		.ry6ste
		.s6aans
		.s4af
		.s4ag
		.sa7gopa
		.s6akty
		.s4am
		.sa6vlo
		.s4ca
		.se6an.
		.see5ra
		.see7ys.
		.se7khuk
		.se6laa
		.se6lop
		.se7reni
		.se6sle
		.ses5t
		.se6suu
		.se6tap
		.se4tr
		.sex5y
		.s6fale
		.s4fi
		.s4gr
		.s4ha4
		.s4he
		.s4hi
		.s4ho
		.s4hu
		.s4in
		.si6nes
		.si7pho.
		.si7rag.
		.s4ja
		.s4ka
		.s4ke
		.s4kl
		.s4ko
		.s4kr
		.s4ku
		.slag5
		.s4ma
		.s4me
		.s4mi
		.s4mo
		.s4mu
		.s6nags
		.s4ne
		.sod4
		.so7dafa
		.so7dwan
		.so7iets
		.so6kop
		.some4
		.s6oms.
		.s4on
		.so6neg
		.s4op
		.so6pek
		.so7phok
		.so7ross
		.s4pe
		.s4pl
		.spo4g
		.s6pren
		.s4py
		.s8ri.
		.s4ta
		.s6temp
		.ste7rol
		.ster6ta
		.ster6t7j
		.s4ti
		.s4to
		.straf5
		.s6trei
		.s6tuar
		.stuc5
		.su7biet
		.sub5m
		.sub5p
		.su8e.
		.s4ui
		.su5kr
		.su7ther
		.su7tra.
		.s4we
		.s4wi
		.s4wo
		.sy1
		.sy6lvi
		.sy7nagr
		.sy7slag
		.t2
		.t6afsy
		.t4ag
		.tee5k
		.te6flo
		.te7rafi
		.te7ragr
		.ter6tj
		.tert7ji
		.te4s5t
		.te7stud
		.ti6ene
		.tie6t5j
		.ti4k
		.ti6ner
		.t6jaai
		.tjok5
		.toe7ys.
		.to6kla
		.to7ky7o.
		.to6lun
		.to7ront
		.tou3
		.trap5r
		.trek5
		.tre4s
		.trie4
		.tries5
		.t4sa
		.ts4h
		.ts6jaa
		.ty6daa
		.ty6dor
		.ty6dra
		.ui6laa
		.ui4t3
		.ui5ti
		.ui5t6ji
		.um7hlan
		.uns4
		.un5st
		.u5raa
		.u5tra
		.va6kad
		.va6kei
		.va6naf
		.va4n5o
		.va7raan
		.va6sen
		.va6swa
		.vas7ys.
		.ve7cino
		.ve7laar
		.ve7lare
		.ve7lêr.
		.ve7loer
		.ve7lome
		.ve7meng
		.ve7rema
		.ve7rena
		.ve7reve
		.ve7skaf
		.ve7tore
		.vlas5
		.vo6gin
		.vo6lyw
		.vo6sko
		.wa7ghri
		.wa4n
		.wa7smou
		.wa6spa
		.web5m
		.we4bo
		.we6b-o
		.week7lan
		.wee4t5
		.we6kuu
		.we4l5a
		.we6lin
		.wel7ing
		.we6nan
		.werk5l
		.wer6k5r
		.we4s5k
		.we6soe
		.we6swa
		.w8hê.
		.w4hi
		.wi6id.
		.wins5
		.wi4p
		.wi4t
		.wî9e.
		.wy7kwas
		.wy7nand
		.wy6net
		.x2
		.y6amin
		.y6anni
		.y6asud
		.yk7loon
		.ys3
		.ys6ere
		.ys5la
		.ze5us
		.z6üric
		.z4wa
		.z4wi
		aa2
		aad1
		aa4da
		aa4de
		aa4do
		aa4d3r
		aaf7emme
		aaf6sat
		aag5al
		aag7asem
		aag7elas
		aag3r
		aag7rond
		aag5s4l
		aag5sp
		aag5st
		aag7swee
		aai7lag.
		aak1
		aa4ka
		aa4ko
		aak3r
		aak7ster
		aak3w
		aal1
		aal6dys
		aald7ys.
		aal5fe
		aal6fpo
		aal5sa
		aal7sfee
		aam1
		aa4ma
		aa4me
		aa4mo
		aam7smul
		aan1
		aan6dou
		aand6re
		aan7dren
		aan7dros
		aan7gons
		aan3k4
		aan5kl
		5aankon
		aan7kry.
		5aanleg
		aan7sage
		aan6see
		aans7eer
		aan6sek
		5aansig
		aan7skem
		aan5sl
		aan5sn
		aan6som
		aan6son
		aan5sp
		aan7tuig
		5aanva
		aap1
		aa4pa
		aa4po
		aap3r
		aa4pu
		aar3a
		aar6dan
		aard7ang
		aard7as.
		aar5de
		aar7ding
		aar4du
		aar3e
		aar3i
		aar7kwek
		aar6lbe
		aar6lka
		aar6lva
		aar6lzi
		aar6l-o
		aar3o
		aar7ser.
		aar7seri
		aar6sid
		aars8teek
		aars8tell
		aars6ti
		5aartap
		aar6tin
		aar7tomo
		aar7tryb
		aar3u
		aas3
		aa4so
		aas7omel
		aat1
		aat7nagt
		aa4to
		aat3r
		aat6sef
		aat7sfee
		aat7slim
		aat6slo
		aat6sly
		aat7sonn
		aat6sow
		aat6sti
		aau6wbe
		aä5ron
		aba6kas
		abak7as.
		aba7komb
		abare4
		aba7ster
		ab3d
		aber6sp
		ab5lau
		ab5rup
		3abso
		abu7scha
		ab5wie
		ac5que
		a2d
		a3da
		a4d3aa
		adam4
		adam7pe.
		ada4r
		a3de
		ades7lan
		ade7smee
		a3di
		adi6eus
		5adjud
		5admin
		a3do
		a4dow
		a3dr
		5adres.
		ads7erwe
		ad4sn
		ads6op.
		ad5sor
		ads7teso
		ad4su
		a3du
		ad5uit
		adu7spel
		adu5tj
		5advert
		a3dy
		ady7smit
		a1e
		ael7atoo
		ae4l5ei
		ae4lo
		aes5to
		aes5tr
		aes7tuur
		aë1
		4afee
		af5eks
		afel5aa
		af4fre
		af5gha
		af5inr
		af3l
		a4fof
		af1r
		af5raa
		af5ram
		af5ran
		a4f3re
		3afri
		a4f5rit
		a4f3ro
		a5frod
		a4f3ru
		af3s4w
		3afva
		afval5
		ag3aa
		a6gaanv
		a4gaar
		ag5adv
		a4g3ak
		ag5alg
		ag5api
		ag5are
		4age.
		4ageb
		4aged
		age6ddo
		a4gei
		4agem
		a4g5erv
		4ages
		a6g5ewen
		agge7us.
		a3gi
		a5ging
		a4g5ins
		agi5s6tr
		ag1l
		ag5ogg
		ag5ord
		ag5ork
		ag5oud
		a4g3re
		ag5rei
		a4g3ru
		ag3sa
		ags7abno
		ag6sins
		ag5ska
		ags7koev
		ag5skol
		ag5skr
		ag5sky
		ags4lo
		ag4sn
		ags6oep
		ag5som.
		ags6oom
		ags6op.
		ag5spe
		ag5s6por
		ags4t
		ags7taal
		ag5sti
		ags6waa
		ags6wee
		ag4tu
		agt7uur.
		a4g3ui
		ag5ure
		ag5uur
		ag-7lag.
		aher4
		ahe5ri
		a4hs.
		ai1
		aig6ne.
		aiï5er
		ai4lp
		ain6ste
		aip6eis
		ai3s4k
		ai5sla
		ais4p
		ais7prys
		ais4t
		ai3tj
		ai3t4r
		a4k5aan
		ak5arb
		ake6lee
		ake6lof
		ak5ess
		ak5ins
		akis4
		akis7te.
		5akkoo
		a2k3l
		a5klank
		ak6leet
		a2k3n
		ako6bre
		ak5oms
		a1kr
		a4k3re
		ak5rig
		ak4sc
		ak5sme
		ak3sp
		a4k3ui
		a2kw
		ak3we
		ak5win
		a3ky
		a4kys
		a1la
		ala7gadi
		a5lagm
		al5agt
		ala7kled
		alan7gaa
		al5dei
		a4lef
		ale6str
		al4f3e
		alf6eni
		al4fh
		al5fie
		al4fj
		alf7olie
		alf6sko
		alf6sni
		alf6sta
		alfs7tan
		al4fu
		alf4-
		5algori
		alien5s
		ali6gal
		ali7glas
		alk7aard
		alk7laag
		alk7oond
		alk5sp
		al4kui
		alk7wyk.
		5alleen
		alm7eier
		alm7lont
		a1lo
		als4a
		als7agti
		als7ghaa
		al6skel
		als7kelk
		als5li
		al4s5oo
		als7pret
		als5waa
		als7werw
		alt6hea
		alt6hus
		alt7rots
		alt6sas
		alt6wee
		a1lu
		alve5o
		a2m
		a3ma
		ama3k4
		aman6t5j
		ama7rins
		am5atoo
		5ambag
		5ambass
		a3me
		am5egt
		ame6sin
		ame5sm
		ame6spo
		a3mi
		ami7skyw
		amm6afu
		5ammun
		a3mo
		amp7arre
		amp7lag.
		amp7leer
		amp7lig.
		amp7lug.
		amp7omhe
		amp7seël
		amp7sfee
		amp7sier
		amp7staf
		amp7staw
		ams7esel
		am6s5kop
		ams7lend
		am6smet
		ams7meti
		ams6mul
		am4s3o
		ams7pels
		am6swan
		am6swar
		ams7wyn.
		a3mu
		a4mui
		am5uit
		a3my
		an5agt
		ana7kwal
		an5alf
		ana6spi
		an4c-
		and7aans
		and7adel
		an6dakt
		an5dan
		and7anal
		an4dap
		an6dase
		an6datt
		and7attr
		an6degt
		and7egte
		and5eks
		and7emal
		an6derf
		and7erf.
		an6dete
		and7etes
		and7eval
		an6dinw
		and7inwa
		and6ja.
		and6jar
		an4d5om
		an4don
		an4d5op
		and7oud.
		an6drak
		an4dro
		and6ser
		and6s7kop
		and7spaa
		and7spre
		and7steg
		and7swee
		an7dwing
		and7wyn.
		ane6ron
		ang7aal.
		ang7adem
		ang7ghor
		ang6hai
		ang6lad
		an5g4li
		an6glig
		ang7lig.
		ang7lip.
		ang6nol
		ang6ons
		ang7ore.
		ang7repu
		ang7sakm
		ang6ska
		ang7snee
		ang6s7te.
		ang7stem
		ang6sur
		ang7ure.
		anie6t5r
		an5inl
		ani5sf
		ani7slaw
		an6kase
		ank7asem
		ank7refe
		an4kry
		ank3w
		an5ops
		an5opt
		an5opv
		an5ord
		an5org
		ano7roei
		ano7stoe
		anr6hyn
		ans7aalw
		an4s5am
		an6sass
		ans7asse
		an4sc
		ans7eila
		ans7eura
		an6sink
		ans7ink.
		an6sjek
		ans7jekk
		ans7jord
		an4ske
		ans5kei
		an6skin
		an6s5kop
		ans7kous
		an6slat
		ans7mada
		an4sn
		ans7oran
		an4s5pa
		an6sper
		ans7pet.
